Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-155
Lancaster.

The county of Lancaster is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township seven, north, of range five, east; thence east to southeast corner of township seven, north, of range eight, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township twelve, north, of range eight, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township twelve, north, of range five, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 32, p. 218;

R.S.1913, § 868;

C.S.1922, § 770;

C.S.1929, § 25-157;

R.S.1943, § 22-155.